Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,220.02
Foreign corporation; cessation of domestication.

Any foreign corporation which has domesticated pursuant to section 21-2,220.01 may cease to be a foreign domesticated corporation by filing with the Secretary of State a certified copy of a resolution adopted by its board of directors renouncing its domestication and withdrawing its acceptance and agreement provided for in section 21-2,220.01.

Laws 2016, LB794, § 12.
January 1, 2017